Utah statutes.
16-16-601.   Member's interest.

A member's interest:

(1)  is personal property;

(2)  consists of:

(a)  governance rights;

(b)  financial rights; and

(c)  the right or obligation, if any, to do business with the limited cooperative association; and

(3)  may be in certificated or uncertificated form.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

